Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF885.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. NEW SECTION . 483A.8D Disabled veterans ââ deer hunting licenses. 1. A disabled veteran who is a resident may be issued one any sex deer hunting license to hunt deer during any established firearm deer hunting season using the method of take authorized for the season being hunted. A person who applies for a license pursuant to this section shall complete a form, as required by rule, that provides proof of the personâs resident and disability status. 2. A person may obtain a license under this section in addition to any other deer hunting license for which the person is eligible. 3. For purposes of this section, âdisabled veteranâ means a person who has served in the armed forces of the United States on federal active duty and who was disabled during the veteranâs military service, as verified by the department of veterans affairs. Sec. 2. Section 483A.24, subsection 4, unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: The director shall provide up to seventy-five one hundred twenty-five nonresident wild turkey hunting licenses for allocation as provided in this subsection . House File 885, p. 2 Sec. 3. Section 483A.24, subsection 4, paragraph b, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: b. Twenty-five Seventy-five of the nonresident wild turkey hunting licenses shall be allocated as provided in subsection 5 . Sec. 4. Section 483A.24, subsection 5, unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: Seventy-five of the nonresident deer hunting licenses allocated under subsection 3 and twenty-five seventy-five of the wild turkey hunting licenses allocated under subsection 4 shall be available for issuance to nonresidents who have served in the armed forces of the United States on active federal service and who were disabled during the veteranâs military service or who are serving in the armed forces of the United States on active federal service and have been disabled during military service to enable the disabled person to participate in a hunt that is conducted by an organization that conducts hunting experiences in this state for disabled persons. The licenses shall be issued as follows: ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate I hereby certify that this bill originated in the House and is known as House File 885, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ MEGHAN NELSON Chief Clerk of the House Approved _______________, 2025 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor